New York, session 2025-2026, S2010.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 720 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 720. Encroachment or adverse effect upon military operations by tall 4 energy structures, major renewable energy facilities or wind energy 5 facilities. 1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms 6 shall have the following meanings: 7 (a) "Tall energy structure" shall mean any structure that has as its 8 primary use the generation or transmission of energy and which is two 9 hundred or more feet in height. 10 (b) "Major renewable energy facility" shall mean any facility as 11 defined in subdivision four of section one hundred thirty-seven of the 12 public service law. 13 2. The construction or operation of any tall energy structure, major 14 renewable energy facility or wind energy facility in this state shall 15 not encroach upon or otherwise have an adverse impact on military oper- 16 ations and readiness of any military installation or branch of the mili- 17 tary. 18 3. A local government or the New York state board on electric gener- 19 ation siting and the environment (hereinafter, "the board"), prior to 20 approving an application for the construction of a tall energy structure 21 shall require the applicant to provide the local government or the board 22 with the following: 23 (a) a written determination of no hazard to air navigation issued by 24 the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 77, 25 Subpart D; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00769-01-5 S. 2010 2 1 (b) in coordination with any affected military installation and the 2 state division of homeland security and emergency services, a written 3 determination resolving any adverse impact to military operations iden- 4 tified during the aeronautics study conducted pursuant to 14 C.F.R. 5 Part 77, Subpart D. 6 A proposed tall energy structure shall be subject to the provisions of 7 subdivision two of this section even if the local government or the 8 board either does not require an application prior to the construction 9 of a tall energy structure or does not require the application outlined 10 in this subdivision. 11 4. The board, prior to approving an application for the construction 12 of a major renewable energy facility shall require the applicant to file 13 an application with the Federal Aviation Administration under 49 U.S.C. 14 § 44718, and provide the board with the following: 15 (a) a written determination of no hazard to air navigation issued by 16 the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 77, 17 Subpart D; and 18 (b) in coordination with any affected military installation and the 19 state division of homeland security and emergency services, a written 20 determination resolving any adverse impact to military operations iden- 21 tified during the aeronautics study conducted pursuant to 14 C.F.R. 22 Part 77, Subpart D. 23 The major renewable energy facility shall be subject to the provisions 24 of subdivision two of this section even if the board either does not 25 require an application prior to the construction of the major renewable 26 energy facility or does not require the application outlined in this 27 subdivision. 28 5. Prior to any planned construction of a wind energy facility, an 29 applicant shall provide the local government or the board considering an 30 application with a map showing the specific location and tower hub 31 height, with rotor diameter, for each proposed wind turbine. 32 6. A local government or the board may not approve an application for 33 the construction of a wind energy facility unless the applicant provides 34 the following documentation: 35 (a) a completed department of defense siting clearinghouse formal 36 review; and 37 (b) a written determination of no hazard to air navigation issued by 38 the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 77, 39 Subpart D. 40 7. Notwithstanding subdivision six of this section, a local government 41 or the board may approve an application for the construction of a wind 42 energy facility conditioned upon the applicant providing the documenta- 43 tion set out in subdivision six of this section. 44 8. If any dispute arises between a local government or the board and 45 an applicant or military installation relating to the approval of any 46 tall energy structure, major renewable energy facility or wind energy 47 facility, the local government or the board shall provide notice to the 48 governor or the governor's designee to facilitate resolution of the 49 dispute. 50 9. A local government or the board shall not require any other formal 51 written approval from a military installation to approve an application 52 for the construction of a tall energy structure, a major renewable ener- 53 gy facility or a wind energy facility. 54 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.